Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska85-2203
Definitions, where found.

For purposes of the Community College Foundation and Equalization Aid Act, the definitions found in sections 85-2204 to 85-2220 apply.

Laws 2007, LB342, § 3.
June 30, 2011